District of Columbia statutes.
7-2341.27

Repeal of existing regulations.

(a)

To the extent not explicitly superseded by the provisions of this chapter, the Ambulance and Medical Personnel Regulation (29 DCMR § 500 et seq.) shall remain in effect until superseded by rules promulgated by the Mayor pursuant to the authority of this chapter. Upon the effective date of rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter, each superseded portion of the Ambulance and Medical Personnel Regulation shall be deemed repealed.

(b)

The Adult Trauma Care rules (22 DCMR § 2700 et seq.) and the Pediatric Trauma care rules (22 DCMR § 2800 et seq.) shall remain in effect until superseded by new trauma care rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-357, § 28, 56 DCR 1167

History